Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2542.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that 92 percent of drugs tested on animals fail to meet safety and efficacy standards for human use. The legislature also finds that alternative, nonanimal test methods can be more effective and efficient for drug development, including producing results that are more human-relevant as well as reducing the time and cost of drug development.(2) The legislature also finds that federal laws and policies support the use of alternative, nonanimal test methods in drug development.(3) Furthermore, the legislature finds that a majority of the public supports replacing the use of animals in experiments with alternative test methods.(4) The legislature therefore intends to require the use of available test methods that are alternatives to animal test methods in the interest of providing consumers with drugs that are developed effectively and efficiently.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Alternative test method" means a test method that:(a) Provides information of equivalent or better scientific quality and relevance than animal test methods;(b) Has been identified by a validation body and adopted by the relevant federal agency or program within an agency responsible for regulating the specific product or activity for which the test is being conducted; and(c) Does not use animals.(2) "Animal" has the same definition as in RCW 16.52.205.(3) "Animal test method" means a process or procedure that uses animals to obtain information.(4) "Animal testing facility" means any facility, including a private entity, state agency, or institution of higher education, that confines and uses animals for research, education, testing, or other scientific or medical purpose.(5) "Contract testing facility" means any partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity that tests chemicals, ingredients, product formulations, or products on behalf of another entity.(6) "Drug" has the same meaning as in 21 U.S.C. Sec. 321(g)(1) as it exists on the effective date of this section.(7) "Drug development process" means the investigation of the safety and effectiveness of a drug, including discovery, development, and preclinical research.(8) "Manufacturer" means any partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity that produces chemicals, ingredients, product formulations, or products.(9) "Validation body" means any organization that seeks to facilitate development, validation, and regulatory acceptance of new and revised regulatory test methods that reduce, refine, or replace the use of animals in testing, such as the interagency coordinating committee on the validation of alternative methods or other similar organizations.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) No animal testing facility, contract testing facility, or manufacturer shall use an animal test method in a drug development process when an alternative test method is available.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the use of a test method that does not use animals.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. The legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Violations of this chapter are not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business. A violation of this chapter is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. This chapter does not apply when an animal test method is required by a federal regulatory authority.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 69 RCW.--- END ---